Washington statutes.
RCW 13.24.040

Financial arrangements.

The compact administrator, subject to the approval of the office of financial management, may make or arrange for any payments necessary to discharge any financial obligations imposed upon this state by the compact or by any supplementary agreement entered into thereunder.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 86 s 1; 1955 c 284 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 86: "If any provision of this 1979 act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 ex.s. c 86 s 9.]